Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
Number of Reviews
16

Author
Max Scheinin
Originally released 1958, rereleased 1996
An Alfred Hitchcock film, "Vertigo".
Starring: James Stewart, Kim Novak, Barbara Bel Geddes, Tom Helmore, Ellen
Corby, Henry Jones, Raymond Bailey, Lee Patrick
Rating: ****
Today I saw what I, and many others consider Alfred Hitchcock's
greatest masterpiece, his crown jewel, the haunting and nearly
transcendent Vertigo for the third time. Though upon previous viewings
I had seen the movie's brilliance, and thought it an extraordinary
film I had never been quite so purely caught up in it's story. It is a
ravishing entertainment, a beautifully acted, carefully constructed,
stunning film about love, deceit, and obsession.
My experience of the movie was different from before though, and for a
most important reason: I saw it on a big screen.  To be fair the
screeen isn't that big. I saw it at the Nickelodeon, a local theater
beautifully furnished, old-fashioned, utterly charming. The room I sat
in had 200 seats, and I am sad to say that only about 17 of them were
occupied ( I suppose everyone else was busy watching Men In Black for
a third time ).  My good friend and fellow film nut Alex agreed to see
it with me ( it's his favorite film of all time ). Together we entered
the darkened theater to hear the distinct strains of Bernard Hermann's
haunting score, munching popcorn, watching a story - not a
film. Vertigo is gripping from the first frame to the last. Do you
remember the first shot? It shows Kim Novak's face, aware and sharp, a
tad suspicious, a bit nervous, thoroughly frightened. Her eyes dart
from one side to the other. Is anyone watching her? Saul Bass did the
teriffic credits sequence. Alone the opening is a tour de force.
Anyone who has never seen Vertigo is in for a wonderful suprise. For
fear of spoiling the plot's suprises I will tread carefully. Scottie
Ferguson ( Jimmy Stewart ) was previously a police man, but his newly
discovered fear of heights, or Vertigo, has made him retire from the
profession. One day, soon after his retirement he is asked by an old
friend Gavin Elster ( Tom Helmore ) to follow his wife whom he
believes is possesed by an ancestor named Carlotta Valdes who commited
suicide when she was twenty six. Guess how old the wife is. Scottie
follows her and finds that he cannot save her because of his
vertigo. She commits suicide. Enter the film's equally gripping second
half.
Vertigo is a haunting film; not once do you check the time and yawn as
you do at your average Batman And Robin ( although I admit that upon
my first viewing of the film I found the second half a tad boring
). By the time the final fade-out comes you have been possesed too;
not by Carlotta Valdes but by Alfred Hitchcock.  Like the works of
Chaplin, Welles and Satyajit Ray, Casablanca, Citizen Kane, Battleship
Potemkin, 2001: A Space Oddessey, and The Godfather part I and II you
do not love movies if you haven't seen this one, nor are you a real
american. Put it on your must-see list.
Vertigo runs 2:06, and if it ran a minute less it would be a crime. It
is truly one of the greatest films ever made,and everone should ake an
effort to see it. My friend Alex seemed to have had my reaction to the
film; we were both spell bound by the events unfolding on the
screen. If you have a chance see it on a big screen if you haven't
already, or at least rent it on tape. You can not be my friend unless
you have seen Vertigo. Anyway see it. There are no flaws in this
film. It accomplishes everything it wants to which is why I am giving
it all ****.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen with Andrea and Byron for free on 12 August 1997 at Bryant Park. 
*Vertigo* is another movie that was lovingly restored recently and made
the rounds recently. *Vertigo*, it turns out, is a movie that is easily
seen and not heard. Hearing it is practically a formality, because the
real joy is in the viewing. 
As a Hitchcock fan and movie fan, I am even surprised at myself for saying
this. After all, it's a classic, a masterpiece. There is only one very big
problem with the movie. The story is absolutely ridiculous and
implausible. It's a narrative sieve upon inspection!
Police detective Scotty (James Stewart) has a nervous
breakdown following a rooftop chase in which he nearly died. He remains
acrophobic and quits the force. Even the top of a stepladder gets him
nervous and sweaty. He is hired by an old college friend to follow his
troubled wife Madeleine (Kim Novak) around town as she relives the tragic
last days of her disturbed birthgrandmother. Madeleine looks great, has
class, and is dying to kill herself. No big surprise when she falls off a
Spanish mission bell tower, leaving Scotty with a metric ton of guilt.
The pair fell in love and he sees her wherever he goes, at all the places
she used to haunt. No one is more surprised than Scotty when trashy Judy
(Kim Novak again) from Kansas City steps into view. Scotty obsesses on her
and tries to turn her into Madeleine. Actually, he does--same clothes,
hair and mannerisms. If this were filmed today, it would be a Sunday
"woman in distress"; movie starring Joanna Kern getting a court order
against Woody Harrelson entitled The Stalker Had Two Girlfriends. Two
women at the bus stop who never saw Vertigo before were not sure about
certain plot points, but agreed that Scotty "was crazy, right?"
Barbara Bel Geddes plays the innocent exgirlfriend bystander, bra designer
Midge. 
The true star of *Vertigo* is the meticulous placement and manipulation of
everything on the screen by Hitchcock. It is a lush pastel oasis. It is
beautifully filmed and even the hyperbolic parts (Scotty's dreams and
telling flashbacks) are effective. It is so hypnotically beautiful that
paying attention to the story actually gets in the way sometimes. It is
like a Japanese garden. Everything is perfectly placed. 
*Vertigo* languished unseen for years when Hitchcock died and it was part
of a probate process. It was re-released with great fanfare in 1984 along
with several other Hitchcock movies from the 1950s--including some with
star Stewart (*Rear Window*, *Rope*, and *The Man Who Knew Too Much*).
Others have noted that this is Jimmy Stewart's "darkest role." 
*Vertigo* is filmed in Vistavision for all its worth, and with
letterboxing, it has a chance to languish on TV. The music is absolutely
wonderful, scored by one of Hitchcock's best collaborators, Bernard
Herrmann (best remembered for his work on *Psycho*).
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com
More film reviews by Seth J. Bookey can be seen at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Sean Lee
Directed by Alfred Hitchcock
Written by Alec Coppel and Samuel Taylor
Scottie Fergeson: James Stewart
Madeleine Elster and Judy Barton: Kim Novak
Midge Wood: Barbara Bel Geddes
We squirm nervously as we watch Scottie desperately try to re-create
Madeleine through Judy in Hitchcock's Vertigo. There is something
discomforting about the futility of trying to extract a dead lover from a
stranger. While Scottie's actions can be interpreted as being necrophilic,
our uneasiness with the sequence is a result of something less
psychoanalytical - we empathize with Scottie's pain due to the fact that we
also are no longer attracted to Judy. The reason for this is in itself
disturbing. From the moment Hitchcock reveals to us that Judy is Madeleine,
we realize that what captivated us, enchanted us, was the product of an
actress who lives in a third-class hotel. We can no longer love Madeleine
because we now know that she is poor and has even been `picked up before.'
Hitchcock creates  an important subplot in Vertigo, suggesting that love
cannot transcend barriers of social strata. Though some viewers may find
Judy to be a submissive character, easily yielding to Scottie's attempts to
change her appearance, there is also strength inside her to remain true to
her modest life. She does not run away from her drab furnishings and move in
with Scottie, though she can. She does not reprise the role of Madeleine,
with all the breathless charm and elegance, though she can. Instead, she
wants Scottie to love her for who she is, and it becomes a futile and fatal
effort. Because she is a good actor, Judy has ability to dictate the
situation she is in and possibly even craft a happy ending if she was to
completely subjugate herself to Scottie's desires. But she doesn't and with
every return we make into her spartan apartment we a reminded of her poverty
and the further we drift from our dream and image of Madeleine. Through Judy
's acting, or the lack of acting in the latter half of the movie, Hitchcock
prompts us to look at how we see people and how we judge them by their
superficies.
Aside from Scottie's project to mold Judy into Madeleine, Hitchcock also
presents us with how Scottie treats Judy differently merely on the basis
that she is not Madeleine. We are presented with two, parallel scenes – one
at Ernie's and one at Scottie's apartment in which we can see that Judy is
treated differently. When Scottie first sees Madeleine at Ernie's, she is
dressed in a beautiful green dress that stands out from the colorless attire
of other patrons. Scottie is captivated by her presence. While certainly
part of this is to accentuate Madeleine's beauty and make her stand out from
the crowd, it is interesting that when the two return to the restaurant
later in the movie with Judy as herself, Judy once again is the only person
who wears color. This time, however, Scotties attention turns to the
Madeleine look alike dressed in gray. Hitchcock in both scenes have
Judy/Madeleine as the only patrons that are dressed in color, which is
symbolic of the fact that they are one and alike. By having Scottie's gaze
turn towards the more affluent `Madeleine' even though the real Madeleine is
sitting across from him at the table is our first clue that it may not only
be hair color that is differentiating the two; that is, their different
positions in the social strata supersedes Judy's inherent character.
In the other parallel scene, we see Scottie prompting Judy to sit down in
front of his fireplace after convincing Judy to color her hair. This scene
is a reflection of when Madeleine sits down in front of Scottie's fireplace
to dry off after falling into the bay. The overt difference is that Scottie
is far less interested in conversation with Judy than with Madeleine. What
is disturbing is the fact that Scottie refuses to treat Judy with the same
respect as Madeleine until she can be like her. Madeleine is invited in
front of the fireplace, as Scottie offers her two cushions. However, as
Judy, she is only offered one cushion, and seemingly as an afterthought at
that. We are provoked by this discrepancy in Scottie's manner to question
why Judy is only one cushion worthy. Because there is a seemingly
intentional duplication of the scenes - both showing an insert shot of the
cushions on the ground, the discrepancy in the cushion count is unlikely a
simple anomaly. Rather, once again, Hitchcock subtly indicates the
incongruity that the same character is treated, with the only difference
between Madeleine and Judy being one of class.
 It is important to examine not only how Judy acts but how she doesn't act.
When Judy is Madeleine, she is thoroughly convincing as the rich man's wife.
Not only does she act mysteriously, her technique – the manner in which she
talks, walks, and gestures all authentically epitomize Madeleine's
affluence. As Judy, however, she does not undertake this subterfuge.
Examining Madeleine's speech at Scottie's apartment we see that she speaks
in a breathless, seductive voice. Every phrase is met with a rise in her
eyebrows and a pull of her chin. Even when not speaking, Madeleine's lips
are always parted, as if perpetually awaiting a kiss. As a contrast, Judy's
voice is far less indiscrete, or as Jay Gatsby would say, a voice `full of
money.' Her lips are drawn, and Judy is much less sexual than Madeleine. Why
Hitchcock makes this contrast between Judy as Madeleine and Judy as herself
is important as to how we see Judy's acting. It can be assumed that Judy
never met the real Madeleine; though Gavin Elster may have provided Judy
some cursory instructions on how to act as Madeleine, it should be accepted
that Judy creates the character of Madeleine from her own schemata of how
someone rich and beautiful such as Madeleine should act. Therefore, it is
important to realize that while Judy is fully capable in transcending her
humble stock to take on the role of Madeleine, she does not repossess the
grace nor elegance of Madeleine as Judy. Because Hitchcock spends a great
deal shooting at Judy's apartment rather than Scottie's, this combined with
Judy's insistence to be her true self to Scottie becomes an important test
for both Scottie and the audience. Do we treat people differently because of
their social class? Judy's Madeleine is not a portrayal of the real
Madeleine – it is the product of Judy's acting. Thus difference between the
two is entirely superficial, yet Scottie can only be in love with the
character Judy creates and not who she is. Judy's insistence to not act as
Madeleine in the latter half of the movie becomes not only a testament to
Judy's intrinsic strength, but Scottie's moral weakness.
Near the end of Vertigo, there is a scene where Judy is physically
metamorphosed into Madeleine. Once again, it is made clear that though Judy
may physically appear as Madeleine, the quivering of Judy's lips as she
visibly strains for Scottie's approval gives her away as Judy. Coming out of
the bathroom and before Judy walks towards Scottie, Judy stands for a moment
in front of the green neon sign in front of her window. The shot of her in
front of the green neon, part of Judy's hotel, is so powerful that it
immerses Judy in its green light, giving Judy a very ethereal quality. Under
the theme of affluence and class, one should examine the use of the color
green in the movie. Hitchcock has said that green is the color of ghosts,
and in such a sense our first shots of Madeleine and Judy both in green
clothes may suugest the Judy – Madeleine duplicity. Along this line, one can
easily see the richness of the scene in which Judy, doused in a green neon
flame not only literally appears like a ghost, but also alludes to the fact
that Madeleine, who Judy is now dressed like, is also a ghost. Though this
is the intent of the scene on one level, the color green also possesses a
second meaning. Green is also a color of wealth and prosperity. The green
Jaguar that Madeleine drives is an explicit example; British green has long
been a color associated exclusively with luxury automobiles. Even today, we
find green a prevalent choice in expensive automobiles while not on
subcompacts. Though perhaps a bit trite, green is the color of money, and
subsequently, the color of our desires. In Vertigo, however, green can also
serve as reminder of the absence of fortune. Unlike Gatsby's yearning for
the green light at Daisy's dock, Judy's green light is one that reads
`Empire Hotel.' This neon, which silhouettes Judy in one scene and engulfs
her in another serves as a garish reminder that this is no longer the Judy
that drives a Jaguar; this is the Judy that lives in a third-class hotel. By
having Judy separated from Scottie by the vulgar green neon, we see that it
is the wealth absent in Judy that ultimately alienates Scottie from her; the
constant reminder of Judy's poverty is powerful enough to overcome her
appearance as Madeleine.
If Judy's struggle for identity is characterized by her unwillingness to
reprise her role of Madeleine, then it is very possible in the scene that
follows the orgasmic physical metamorphosis Judy plays out a final,
desperate act. One should recall that Judy had originally intended to
divulge Elster's plan; however, Judy tears the confessional not to protect
Gavin, but as an attempt to make Scottie fall in love with herself, not
Madeleine. But things go awry and Judy sees that Scottie is obsessed with
Madeleine. For someone who so close came to a disclosure earlier, wouldn't
as an act of desperation, would Judy feel inclined to confess herself as
Madeleine? I believe she does in the scene when she puts on Carlotta's
necklace. Though it may seem her decision to put on the necklace that night
was a grand slip on Judy's part, I would suggest it is her final performance
as an actress – a desperate move to tell Scottie that she was Madeleine.
Though she acts as though putting on the necklace is a casual affair, this
is the first time we see Judy wearing a black dress. The necklace, then,
even without Hitchcock's insert shot, would become the centerpiece of her
ensemble. Furthermore, Judy prompts Scottie to clasp Carlotta's necklace for
her, drawing more attention to the jewelry. As Scottie works the clasp from
behind Judy, she faces towards the mirror, almost inviting attention to the
necklace. Finally, when Scottie asks, `How do you work this thing?' Judy
responds, `Can't you see?' Judy's line, though on the surface directed at
the logistics of the clasp, is at the same time Judy's confession of her
crime and a revelation of her identity. `Can't you see that I'm wearing
Carlotta's necklace?' `Can't you see that I am Madeleine?' It would be too
irresponsible if Judy pulled out her most expensive piece of jewelry without
remembering its significance. Rather, in her last heartfelt acting job, she
shows Scottie what he wants to see in hopes that he can finally love her for
being Judy. Sadly, her hopes for a silent reconciliation are met with
Scottie's contempt, for he is now faced to confront the fact that Judy will
never play the role of Madeleine again.
humble girl is given the role of a lifetime in Vertigo. Like a starlet who
peaks too soon, Judy becomes haunted by her single, solitary role. In her
decision not to recapitulate her role as Madeleine, she becomes unable to
transcend her tawdry life to become the affluent ghost Scottie is in love
with. Hitchcock poses an important question for the audience of  Vertigo –
Why can't we fall in love with the same woman? It would seem the fact that
Judy is Madeleine would draw us closer to her, yet ironically, our knowledge
of her humble stock seems to extinguish our desire for her altogether. For
what is the inherent difference between Madeleine and Judy? Though both
characters are played by the same woman, the division between Madeleine and
Judy is one of social status. In Vertigo, as we frustratingly watch Judy
refuse to become Madeleine, Hitchcock prompts us to confront our own
fixations with superficiality and status.

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://ofcs.org
Why does Alfred Hitchcock's picture 'Vertigo' endure as such an 
important piece, more than forty years after it was made?
Universal recently committed more than $1 million for its restoration, a 
process that gives modern moviegoers outstanding clarity of image and 
sound.  According to the experts in charge of the restoration, audiences 
for the next 200 years should be able to enjoy their restored version.
Then there are the ardent fans of Hitchcock's - the ones who claim this 
is his masterpiece, one of the very best films.  How talk was started 
that 'Vertigo' is a personal film I don't know;  but there is an odd, 
desultory tone to 'Vertigo', a slow sadness that punctuates the 
passionate emotions and intense action scenes.
Finally, I know first hand that 'Vertigo' is watchable by contemporary 
youngsters:  my 14 year-old son and ten year-old daughter were glued to 
our television while the tape played.
Like many of the stories selected by the meticulous Hitchcock, the plot 
of 'Vertigo' is difficult to describe.  It's nearly like putting into 
words the bizarre images from an MTV video or a commercial with 
fast-paced digitized figures.  Here goes:  John "Scottie" Ferguson 
(James Stewart) has imposed retirement on himself because he suffers 
attacks of anxiety and dizziness when he looks down from great heights.  
Another dimension of his uneasiness is guilt.  John had been a 
detective, and when he'd fallen during a chase and hung from the gutter 
of a building, he'd watched a police officer trying to help him fall to 
his death.
Where the story starts to writhe with originality is when a college 
buddy of the aging Ferguson contacts him with a request.  The 
ship-building executive Gavin Elster (Tom Helmore) apparently has a 
young wife who is preoccupied with living the life - and perhaps the 
death - of Carlotta Valdez, her great-grandmother.  Elster wants 
Ferguson to follow Madeleine Elster (Kim Novak) and note her wanderings 
- and protect her from herself, if necessary.  In the following 
sequences we watch Scottie Ferguson trail Madeleine to a flower market, 
a museum, a boarding hotel, and the farthest destination, 100 miles 
south of San Francisco, a Spanish mission.  In these places Madeleine 
seems to assume a trace-like state in which she patterns her behavior 
after Carlotta, a woman who took her life after a period of depression 
and distraction brought on by losing custody of her daughter.
What the husband, Elster, had not counted on was his friend's falling in 
love with Madeleine.  For awhile Ferguson follows her undetected.  But 
when he witnesses her jump into San Francisco Bay, he dives in and 
brings her back to his own apartment.  Though at first it seems 
Madeleine wants nothing to do with Ferguson, she returns to drop off a 
thank-you note.  Ferguson happens to follow her to his own apartment, 
where he expresses tentative affections that she returns.  Later, in a 
stunning scene back at the mission, their relationship ends, sending 
Ferguson into a mute depression, an acute "melancholia" from which he 
emerges, after a year, as a man obsessed with regaining what he's lost.  
Novak returns in a brilliant double role as Judy Barton, a woman who 
looks just like Madeleine Elster. Enough said that the two fall in 
complicated love, and relive crucial and compelling scenes.
The literary elements in Hitchcock's films are always remarkable.  That 
his plots resemble finely written stories is no mistake.  In 'Vertigo' 
we see the director's fascination with heights, first of all, 
illustrating the terror felt by Ferguson as he glances from high-rise 
windows or simply down a flight of steps.  The part of the body featured 
in this film seems to be the eyes.  From the swirling vortex in Saul 
Bass' title design, to extreme close-ups of the eyes of the main 
players, we catch glimpses of troubled souls.  Other leit motifs include 
jewelry, paintings, water, and lurid lighting.  Hitchcock also expertly 
uses dramatic irony, given to us in a sudden sequence late in the story, 
just before we need to know it.  Finally, the master of suspense is not 
above using even animation, in a dream scene, to assist in showing the 
deteriorating psyche of the beleaguered detective Ferguson.
Jimmy Stewart is as impressive as ever in the leading role.  Stewart is 
the ultra-rare combination of modest looks and supreme composure.  The 
best thing is, oddly enough, that when he loses this composure, he is 
completely convincing, his acting completely transparent.  Occasionally 
in the story Ferguson acts flippant and nonchalant, as in many scenes 
with his old pal "Midge" Wood, an artist to whom he was engaged briefly 
several years before.  (Midge is played by the wonderful stage and film 
character actress Barbara Bel Geddes.)  Soon Ferguson displays a 
tortured affliction that surprises the viewer.  This actor depicts an 
astonishing range - always natural and sympathetic.  At first feeling 
sorry for the psychologically troubled Madeleine, Ferguson dabbles in 
attempted cure;  a failed healer, he tries later to cure himself.  What 
a paradoxical role this one, vastly different from the others he played 
for Hitchcock.
Kim Novak's character was originally given to Vera Miles.  But when 
production was delayed by Hitchcock's gall bladder operation, Miles 
announced she was pregnant and could not play this challenging role.  
Hence the glamorous Novak's selection as the troubled blonde Madeleine 
Elster, and as her doppelganger, the less sophisticated Judy Barton.  
Novak's acting is never over-stated;  it seems natural without the 
wooden façade many of her contemporaries practiced - like Miles, for 
instance, practices in 'Psycho.'
Another reason this story endures is its universal contradictions.  It 
is at once a mystery and a romance, with loads of forbidden behaviors 
that must have struck audiences of the late '50s as terribly risqué.  
Why does Scottie Ferguson pursue the damaged (and married) femme fatale, 
instead of the comfortable, mothering Midge?  Sinister schemes, trauma, 
searches for redemption - all of these themes commingle in Hitchcock's 
agenda.
In service of his "pure cinema" philosophy, Hitchcock crafts long 
establishing shots (remember the opening of 'Psycho'?), and paces some 
scenes slowly.  For a thriller, 'Vertigo' has relatively few frenetic 
scenes.  Modern audiences will yawn during a few of the characters' 
conversations, even though their dialogue was approved by the stamp of 
Hitchcock's wit.  If 'Vertigo' were to be remade, as Gus Van Sant remade 
'Psycho,' the newer text would be comparably inferior.  Certainly, 
though, a few plot elements could be borrowed, as it's hard to think of 
a film with such a stunning and thematically unified conclusion.
The rock band Harvey Danger demonstrates the lasting impact of 'Vertigo' 
in their song 'Carlotta Valdez.'  My son spotted the allusion 
immediately, and played the track from the CD 'Where Have All the 
Merrymakers Gone?'
One thing that is reinforced to me weekly, as I view modern movies:  the 
past is in no way inferior to the present.  Many of us have constructed 
borders around ourselves, and are convinced we do not like black and 
white films, or anything older than we are, or anything with subtitles….  
The list goes on.  For sure, Alfred Hitchcock is an original voice who 
takes his place in the canon of great directors, whether or not 
'Vertigo' makes everyone's short lists of the best films ever made.
Get Your Private, Free Email at http://www.hotmail.com

Author
Ian Low
In the pantheon of film making, there are undoubtable classics that stand
out as monumental artifacts of this art form. Some of these remain the
standards where new films are measured against and even imitated upon.
Citizen Kane, Casablanca and Lawrence of Arabia are such examples of a great
tradition of movie making that have been widely praised, liked and even
analyzed upon in countless books and articles. Yet, legendary as these films
are, there is one motion picture that has reached the heights of such
similar classic status, but still remains as one of the least conspicuous
among its more illustrious peers. I am referring to Alfred Hitchcock's
Vertigo.
Released to muted reviews and disappointing box office receipts, Vertigo has
since gained much respect and admiration from all aspects of the film
community. Ranging from film historians to the casual fan, Vertigo has now
deservedly taken its place among Hitchcock's other classic films as one of
the most intriguing of all thriller movies. And certainly, one of the most
personal films ever to have emerged from arguably, the best director in this
business. Beginning with this movie, Hitchcock managed to create a trilogy
of films in successive years that is perhaps, the most remarkable ever
attempted by any director. North By Northwest, Psycho and Vertigo feature
frequently among critics' best of lists and represents the culmination of
Hitchcock's prowess, as well as showcasing his brilliant skills as a
film-maker and his extensive knowledge of the language of the cinema.
Part of the mystique of the movie stems from the fact that it is misleading
the viewer right from the beginning, the plot seemingly about how James
Stewart's character, Scottie Ferguson tries to prevent "Madeline", played by
Kim Novak, from succumbing to a supernatural force that threatens to possess
and ultimately, overwhelms her. This deception is carried on brilliantly by
both the performances and the usually taut direction that Hitchcock imposes
on the entire picture. It is not until the middle third of the movie, that
Hitchcock surprisingly reveals the mystery in a fashion that completely
catches the viewer off guard. From there on, the film shifts to a more
personal tone of undesirable and questionable obsession on Scottie's part to
transform Judy back into his dream woman that was "Madeline". Yet, the
"Madeline" that he seeks never existed at all. It is this irony that
provides this film with its unique, almost surrealistic tone and among
Hitchcock's works, this is the film that is at once darkly depressing as it
is revealingly autobiographical.
Jimmy Stewart has always been known to play the charming and effervescent
American ordinary everyday guy, a role that is similarly typified by Tom
Hanks today. His winsome smile garnered him with his only Academy award in
The Philadelphia Story and his even more famous turn as George Bailey in
Capra's It's A Wonderful Life cemented Stewart as the quintessential
American hero. A face and a style that any American and even non-American
can identify with. But since he began to work with Hitchcock, Jimmy Stewart
began a series of roles that played him against type and character.
In Rear Window, Stewart's L.B. Jefferies's character begins the film as a
restless voyeuristic photographer. But by the end of the movie, one tends to
forget this questionable aspect of his character as he manages to solve a
murder mystery in the process. In Vertigo, however, Stewart plays a
character that displays even more flaws then the Jefferies character could
ever have. At the beginning, he faces seemingly increasing difficulty in
overcoming his fear of heights that was triggered off by his guilt towards
causing the death of a fellow police officer. Hitchcock then pulls off an
incredible delusion to the audience by deliberately misleading us into
thinking that Scottie Ferguson will conquer his fear by falling in love and
by resolving the mystery that surrounds "Madeline".
For all his reputation for suspense and thriller films, Hitchcock's ultimate
masterpiece does not focus on those two aspects as he does on the personal
aspects of his two main characters in the picture. We are allowed a glimpse
into the director's mindset and dare I say it, his emotions as he molded
Scottie and "Madeline" into human beings that seem at once, frightfully true
to life and yet, almost dreamlike in pure visual terms. As the audience, we
can certainly identify with Scottie's pursuit of his perfect woman as at one
time or another, each one of us had probably wanted to find that same person
who can fulfill our ultimate fantasies. The difference is, Scottie manages
to come close.
Only close, because his fantasy woman is after all, a masquerade fabricated
by his longtime friend Gavin Elster to deliberately lead Scottie into his
murderous scheme as an unknowing accomplice and also, as a convenient
scapegoat and alibi. Judy, the woman who plays the role of "Madeline" is
nothing like the "Madeline" that Scottie envisions. The real Judy is a more
earthly woman that seems at once materialistic and bubbly, which contrasts
strikingly with the icy cold blonde that is "Madeline", who simply emanates
with stylish sophistication. But Scottie is never let into this revelation
as early as the audience, so from the moment the truth is made known to the
viewer, we are made to observe and follow his emotional trauma in losing
"Madeline" and then the joy of rediscovering her in the form of Judy.
The beauty of the picture lies not in watching it for the first time, but
from subsequent viewings, when the audience has the intimate knowledge of
what has happened. The first half of the movie then takes on multiple layers
of meanings and and it becomes a responsibility for the viewer to understand
how difficult it is for Kim Novak to play Judy who herself is playing
"Madeline". Her movements and gestures are even more impressive with the
realization that she herself is putting up an act of deception and deceit.
Yet, from the moment Scottie fishes her out of the waters of the Golden Gate
bridge, the audience can almost identify with the extreme restraint that is
evident in Judy's eyes and that keeps her from revealing herself to Scottie.
Later in Scottie's apartment, we are already well aware of the ruse that
Judy is putting up for him. It is convincing to the point that the first
time viewer is totally taken in by the deception. You could believe that she
was suffering from amnesia, seemingly possessed by a "supernatural spirit"
that guides her through the various locations of San Francisco. But seeing
it the second time, notice how Novak manages to "act" surprised and shocked
in waking up naked in Scottie's room. But for all intents and purposes, she
"lets" him bring her there and even "lets" him undresses her in a deliberate
attempt to delude him. Throughout the whole charade, Scottie is completely
oblivious to the fact that she "knows". It is this idea of irony and
deceptive role-play that gives this film an unusual aural of mystery and
surrealistic romantiscm.
This is a romance that is unlikely, yet when it does finally occur, at the
cliffs where Judy almost overacts her part, we are already under the
impression that Scottie is in love with her. Simultaneously, we are equally
convinced that Judy, masquerading as "Madeline" is also falling for him. The
Hitchcockian touch at resolving this romance is sheer genius as it breaks
new ground in the way it treat film lovers on screen. Electing not to
provide an avenue for the doomed lovers to escape from, he decides to end
the picture almost abruptly at the infamous bell tower scene. It is the same
exact spot where earlier on, Scottie first witnesses the "suicidal" fall of
Elster's real wife. The same exact scene where Scottie relives his guilt at
being unable to prevent a certain death due to his vertigo.
A guilt which is unfairly burdened upon him the second time round as he is
only playing a pawn in the midst of a greater murderous scheme. A scheme
that involves Judy as "Madeline", a common girl hired by Elster because her
looks probably resemble that of Elster's wife. A guilt which would be
further complicated by the realization that Judy would herself find herself
falling hopelessly for him. At the end of the picture, Hitchcock has to
submit Scottie to one last trauma at the bell tower. Right at the moment
when Scottie is faced with the most difficult decision of his life, of
whether or not to bring Judy to justice or simply carry on the deception and
let the past slip by. The appearance of the nun at the top of the bell tower
is an inspired decision, a decision apparently made by Samuel Taylor, the
main scriptwriter for the film.
A nun represents God, and if the ending is abrupt, the resolvement of Judy's
involvement in the murder of the actual "Madeline" is to symbolize the
cliched notion that criminals may escape the hands of the law, but not from
the hand of God. Her apparent accidental fall may be even more symbolic in
the sense that she is re-enacting what she was asked to do by Elster, to
pretend to fall to her death to mask the death and murder of his actual
wife. The terrific irony here again is she is not acting, but really "doing"
it this time. Falling to her own death, which is as real as Elster's wife
death was. With that, the film concludes with the everlasting image of
Stewart's Scottie standing at the bell tower, looking down on the lifeless
body of his de-mystified obsession, a woman who never existed for him. A
woman who was manufactured for the purpose of a diabolical crime, and a
woman who was in turn, re-manufactured by the very same man she was supposed
to deceive.
The re-fashioning of Judy into "Madeline" is itself, worthy of much
discussion. The main focal point becomes that of Judy being willing to
subject herself to a second of time of role-playing. But whereas the first
was due to financial and material benefits, possibly from Elster himself,
the second was unquestionably due to the purpose of pleasing Scottie. For by
the time she was "rediscovered", the audience can sense her love for him.
This is most clearly demonstrated in her reluctance to leave him a goodbye
note explaining the whole crime, and willing to play a second round of
charade with Scottie. And even after voicing her objections to being
remodeled, she eventually subjects herself to Scottie's almost unhealthy
desire to see and possess "Madeline" back in the form of another woman who
"happens" to look like her. This possession obsession at one time becomes
almost surreal. Look at the scene when she finally emerges from the bathroom
as the completed "product".
Roger Ebert calls this the single best shot or sequence that Hitchcock has
ever done, and I am very inclined to agree. The ghostlike green glow serves
as a haunting, almost hallucinating background to Novak's "Madeline" as she
proceeds with almost torturous pace towards Scottie. Their eyes locked in
almost twin emotions of elation and pain. Elation because both have
ultimately satisfied each other's desires. She, because she believes he will
finally accept her, and he, because the woman he thought he had "lost" so
dramatically and tragically has finally returned. In a scene where there is
no background or ambient noise, just images and Bernard Herrmann's stirring
and hauntingly romantic score, it is the ultimate piece of pure cinema
anyone has since or will ever conjure up. The moment the two tragic lovers
lock and embrace, the camera circles around the both of them, and as it does
so, images of San Juan Batista emerge from behind them, as if to indicate
that the past has caught up with the present, and later will engulf them to
a powerfully emotional and tragic end. Yet, Scottie clings on to her as if
he never has lost her, and he is at once willing to believe that she is the
same "Madeline" that he has fallen for during the first part of the film. He
hesitates only for a brief moment, but once he is convinced that she is
"genuine", he embraces her with the utmost of passion that has yet been
captured on celluloid.
Perhaps, the optimist would have hoped the film should have ended there. But
then, there is always the moral issue of not letting characters getting away
with blatant crime, especially when it involves murder. For us, for
Hitchcock, the resolution of this film represents one of the best climatic
endings to a motion picture. Dark, emotional, tense and frightful, these are
the emotions that one goes through together with the two leads as they
ascend the steps of the bell tower. Of course, the innovative "Vertigo" shot
heightens the tension and gives us a visual simulation of what Scottie is
feeling as he looks down towards the depths of the stairs. As Scottie
unravels the truth, a truth where Novak's character and the audience are
already well aware of, we see his expression of anger and of passion at the
same time. Emotions which would have been overplayed by any other actor,
Jimmy Stewart manages to convince us equally of his confusion, his guilt,
his hurt and his ultimate love for a fabled "woman" from which there is no
turning back from. As he reaches the top, he is ultimately faced with his
own strong belief of upholding the law, and his equally passionate feelings
for a woman who has deceived him and yet, now offer the only real hope of
redemption and his only compromised opportunity for a perfect love. And as
he contemplates his decision for either justice or love, he is cruelly
robbed of that decision as Judy accidentally plunges towards her own demise,
a justice meted out by perhaps, in equally "supernatural" manner.
As a motion picture, Vertigo possesses all the necessary technical
credentials for a 1958 film. George Tomasini's taut editing, Robert Burks's
elegant cinematography, Saul Bass's innovative and hypnotic title designs
and of course, Herrmann's score. The importance of how music affects a film
has never been understated. Yet somehow, Herrmann's musical soundtrack
manages to bring images that Burk's camera could not even capture. The
haunting title theme elicits both terror and romance simultaneously, and it
is this musical picture that gives the audience a glance into the movie's
contents right at the beginning of the credits. Coupled this with the eerie
logos supplied creatively by Bass and extreme close-ups of the woman's lips
and eye, Vertigo manages to evoke the entire atmosphere of the film in the
first few minutes. Herrmann's score is never catchy or tuneful, just long
stretches of mesmerizing moods and ambience that complements both story and
performances to perfection. At times overbearing, at times tender, this is
music that lives up to the high expectations of the director and his actors.
Pure cinema such as this could not have been created without the musical
strains of Bernard Herrmann and the striking photography of Burk and
Hitchcock.
Artistically, films like Citizen Kane and A Birth Of A Nation may have
displayed much more cinematic invention in terms of camera techniques and
other technical innovations. Vertigo however, propels the film medium
further by taking the established cinematic approaches and transcends them
by exploring the human emotion on celluloid. To accomplish this requires a
director of immense knowledge and skill, and a touch of brilliance. Further,
a set of actors who are able to translate the written script into film and
then expand on it by giving their own unique touch of humanity and
expression. Alfred Hitchcock, James Stewart and Kim Novak together with
Samuel Taylor and the crew of Vertigo created a cinematic milestone in 1958
and like the aforementioned film classics, it ranks as a motion picture
masterpiece worthy of the highest accolades. In generations to come, Vertigo
will only serve as a reminder to the art of the motion picture ... or in
Hitchcock's preference, the art of pure cinema.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     There is a movement afoot in the movie business to restore some of
the great classic films so that this generation can see them afresh.
Perhaps the best known of these efforts was the restoration a few years
ago of LAWRENCE OF ARABIA.  Some of the work like that done on THE
UMBRELLAS OF CHERBOURG allows the movie to be better even than that
seen by even the original movie audience.
     So it is with the restoration of Alfred Hitchcock's 1958
masterpiece VERTIGO.  Working with some of the original master tapes,
the restorers have given the film a digital stereo sound track.
Hearing Bernard Herrmann's music conducted by that great master Muir
Mathieson makes the effort worthwhile.  His haunting melodies are quite
dramatic with the horns using their lowest notes.  That the restorers
also give us a cleaned up print and vastly improved color rendition is
a bonus.
     Restoration is a difficult process depending on many factors.
Here the result is less than perfect, which is not meant as a
criticism.  The interior sequences are bursting with rich and highly
textured colors, but the exterior ones still seem a bit washed out.
There are a couple of scenes where the print gets too dark and where
the color matching is off.  On the whole, however, the restoration
works, and it is a joy to see this classic in its full glory.
     The story is nominally about the acrophobia of Detective John
'Scottie' or 'Johnny-O' Ferguson (James Stewart).  Even the opening
credits have what look to be early computer generated spirals
reflecting Ferguson's fear of a body spinning down from a tall
building.
     This feeling of acrophobia  or vertigo is nothing more than a plot
device.  It provides the glue that holds the mystery of the story
together.  What makes the film so compelling are the characters swept
up in the vertigo of the mystery.
     After losing a fellow officer to a fall and being unable to catch
him, Ferguson retires from the force.  He hangs out in his friend
Marjorie 'Midge' Wood's (Barbara Bel Geddes) apartment.  Bel Geddes is
easily the most likable actor in the story.  This perky career woman
designs "brassieres" for a living.  She notes that they were designed
using the principles of "a cantilever bridge."
     Midge's costumes by the great Edith Head and the make-up by Wally
Westmore give her the image of a good looking nerd.  She has attractive
but overly conspicuous glasses, and clothes that are all too sensible.
You see she loves her Johnny-O and still waxes nostalgic about how they
were engaged for three weeks in their college days.  Now they are just
chums, but although she wishes their relationship were more
substantial, she would never confess it to Johnny-O.
     John's old college buddy Gavin Elster (Tom Helmore) asks him to
trail his wife Madeleine (Kim Novak).  Madeleine has taken to
disappearing and seems to be doing a mind meld with a dead woman named
Carlotta Valdez.  John hates the idea until he sees Madeleine and then
his hormones kick in.
     If you love San Francisco as much as I do, and especially if you
live near it as I do, the movie provides more gorgeous San Francisco
settings for you to savor than any other movie.  Period.  My personal
favorites are the scenes in and around the California Palace of the
Legend of Honor.  In 1991 I came upon Brian DePalma making a movie
there with Lolita Davidovitch called RAISING CAIN.  It was an awful
film, but as I sat watching the expensive and slow minutia of a film
shoot, I keep reflecting back to Hitchcock's work there over three
decades earlier and in the same spot outside.
     The camera work by Robert Burks is a masterful blend of wide-angle
zooms to create the vertigo effect in the audience and of a traditional
and panoramic approach.
     The automobile's role in movies has changed dramatically.  Cars
play a key part in VERTIGO.  Sometimes they represent their owners in
absentia and thus provide clues to others.  Mainly they are vehicles to
transport couples on long romantic drives up scenic coasts.  Cars in
films today are rarely associated with their owners, and when driven,
are most likely part of a car chase.  The romance is lost forever.
     Alfred Hitchcock is the king of the mysteries, which is not to say
that his are without logical flaws.  My favorite nonsensical happening
in VERTIGO is when Madeleine is rescued unconscious from San Francisco
Bay by John.  He takes her to his apartment rather than the hospital,
and when she awakens, she has fresh make-up and her trademark tons of
lipstick.  They must have had some really long lasting cosmetics back
in the 50's.
     Now that you ask, yes, Hitchcock does his standard quick walk
through one of the scenes.  This "Where's Waldo" is a favorite of
Hitchcock fans like myself, and I certainly will give you no hints when
this occurs.
     Novak gives a wooden performance in the first half, but is quite
intriguing in the second when she comes back to life as Judy Barton.
Stewart has not given a bad performance in his life.  His acting as an
obsessed man in VERTIGO is good, but not his best.
     The script by Samuel Taylor and Alec Coppel (based on a book by
Pierre Boileau and Thomas Narcejac) is well constructed and literate.
Just a couple of examples.  The coroner (Henry Jones) admonishes John
with, "He did nothing.  The law has little to say on things left
undone."  Later, Midge tells John, "I talked to the woman in musical
therapy, and she said that Mozart's the boy for you."
     Ultimately what makes VERTIGO work so well is the direction by the
great master and the stunning music and visuals.  My main criticism of
the film is that the editing by George Tomasini is too slow.  The film
would have been more effective if more tightly focused and about
fifteen more minutes had been left on the cutting room floor.
     The ending of the show is perfect and shocking if you have never
seen it before.  VERTIGO remains a classic bit of cinema that is worth
seeing again.  I would love to see some local theater do an Alfred
Hitchcock festival.  Hint.  Hint.
     VERTIGO runs 2:08.  It is not rated but would be PG today due
solely to the falling scenes.  There is no sex, nudity, or bad
language.  The film will probably only interest kids say ten and up,
but would be acceptable kids a little younger.  I strongly recommend
you check out the restoration now on the big screen as it was meant to
be seen and heard.  I give the film *** 1/2.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
John Locke
Alfred Hitchcock took a certain prankster's liberty with his 
work, most notably, delighting the audience and, no doubt, himself 
with his unpredictable and amusing cameos. While aware of this, we 
still insist on separate Hitchcocks, the pleasingly wicked charmer and 
the serious artist, with never the twain conflicting. However, his cele-
brated masterpiece Vertigo, recently re-released, exposes Jekyll and 
Hyde as the same man. The strange symmetry of the film subverts dra-
matic structure to create a more elaborate joke, showing that Hitchcock 
had ulterior, even mischievous, motives to his direction.
Vertigo opens with a policeman and a detective (James Stewart) chasing
a fugitive across the tops of San Francisco buildings. Scottie, the
detective, slips down a steep roof to end up dangling from a 
flimsy rain gutter. The policeman attempts a rescue but instead falls to 
his death. The scene ends with the horrified Scottie left hanging by his 
fingers.
In the following scene, Scottie discusses his recuperation with 
Midge, an old friend, but his escape from the dangerous predicament of 
the prologue is never explained. Scottie's cane and references to his 
corset are evidence of unspecified physical injuries, but it's his psycho-
logical injury, his vertigo, that entices our curiosity, strongly enough to 
allow incidental acknowledgment of his physical injuries to satisfy us, 
if indeed we question them at all. But on analysis Scottie's physical 
injuries seem disproportionate to the danger; his escape by no means a 
certainty. It appears unlikely he could have pulled himself up alone 
without the gutter tearing away from the building; and there was no one 
else on the roof to provide timely assistance. If he had dropped the six 
stories to the pavement--the same fall that killed the policeman--he 
would at least have broken bones.
The only further references to the accident are deliberately vague.
Midge jokingly warns Scottie not to "go diving off another rooftop,"
an unrevealing exaggeration; Gavin Elster, the old acquaintance 
who hires Scottie to trail his wife, calls the accident "that thing in the 
paper." Since a means for Scottie's escape can be easily imagined, these 
would be petty observations were they not evidence of Hitchcock's 
imprecision. Not only is Scottie literally left hanging in the opening, 
the viewer, too, is "left hanging" by the subsequent lack of explanation. 
And that forms one side of the symmetry, the set up to Hitchcock's joke.
The remainder of the first half of the film is sustained by the 
mystery of Madeleine Elster's (Kim Novak) relationship to the long-
departed Carlotta Valdez, and Scottie's falling in love with the seem-
ingly haunted Madeleine. The section culminates with Madeleine's 
fatal fall from the Mission San Juan Bautista tower. The mystery 
unfolds to expose "Madeleine" as an imposter, Judy, hired by Gavin 
Elster to trick Scottie and allow the murder of the real Madeleine to go 
undetected. As has been widely discussed (and harshly criticized,
particularly on Vertigo's original release), Hitchcock lays out these
startling revelations midway through the film. The bold tactic breaks the 
formulaic structure we expect from a murder mystery, in which solutions
always come at the end. It risks unsettling the viewer, particularly 
on an initial viewing of the film. However, by dispensing with formula, 
Hitchcock shifts the emphasis of the story from murder to character, a 
potentially deeper subject than the typical whodunit conundrum. Scottie's
behavior and motivations replace the enigmatic "Madeleine's" as the
focus of the story. "Madeleine" was strange, Scottie was earthbound; now
they switch. "Madeleine" becomes the commonplace shop clerk, Judy; Scottie
goes through a period of bizarre behavior, including complete mental
withdrawal.
Back on his feet, Scottie's motivations are complex. He 
becomes obsessed with remaking one woman (Judy) in the image of 
another he believes dead ("Madeleine"). Can this really be love? we 
think. Or is Scottie infatuated with the appearance of women but blind 
to substance? Or does he seek the unattainable in order to perpetuate 
desire? In any case, Scottie's feelings are intense, his actions in remak-
ing Judy, imperturbable. In the climax of the story, when Scottie finally 
discovers that Judy is "Madeleine" his choices become even harder to 
fathom. The woman he has labored to remake suddenly becomes, in the 
flesh, the woman he has idealized. If his profound desire is fantasy, will 
achieving the concrete destroy his feelings? Compounding the dilemma,
the new Judy that Scottie discovers has treated him treacherously,
subjecting him to the grief of lost love, the public humiliation of the
inquest, and a nervous breakdown. 
Against all this is the possibility they really love each other. 
Hitchcock sustains our curiosity for the outcome, and perhaps our hope 
for romance, by moderating Judy's character. Despite her likely guilt as 
an accomplice to murder, her moral failure may be less severe. In her 
narrated letter (and the accompanying flashback of the real Madeleine's 
plummet from the tower), we are left with the impression Judy did not 
realize murder would be the result of the scheme to trick Scottie. She 
appears genuinely shocked when Gavin throws Madeleine from the 
tower. Gavin must stifle her screams. Mitigating her responsibility in 
this way gives Scottie room to maneuver emotionally. If he can discover
the truth, he may have grounds for compassion and forgiveness.
(These are the considerations of Scottie, betrayed lover. Additional
questions arise about Scottie, the career lawman who once imagined
becoming Chief of Police. Will he put his obsession above the law and
overlook Judy's crimes? Will he jeopardize his innocence by keeping mum
about the murder?)
The conditions are complicated, but Scottie has the freedom to 
make a choice. Indeed, the story accelerates toward the crucial moment 
in which he will shape his future and define his character. As Scottie 
and Judy struggle to the top of the tower, criminal and emotional 
deceits disintegrate in the heat of exploding truth. There is anger, yet 
passion. The time to choose has arrived. But, disappointingly, chance 
forestalls choice. The pair is startled by a nun ascending into the tower. 
Judy falls from Scottie's arms and out the tower to her death, depriving 
Scottie of his decisions.
Superficially, this conclusion provides some satisfaction, subjecting
Scottie and Judy to like measures of poetic justice, the ironic 
working of fate, or some other intangible force. Scottie loses two loves 
to identical tragedies; Judy dies in the manner of the victim she helped 
murder. Assuming that Hitchcock did not structure the film as a joke, 
this interpretation would leave the conclusion in contradiction with the 
earlier direction of the film. In the long sequence in which Scottie trails 
"Madeleine," we are led to suspect some supernatural force--reincarnation,
ghostly possession, perhaps--as motivating "Madeleine's" strange 
behavior. But the film disavows such forces by resolving the mystery 
with a rational explanation, grounding the story in the worldly realm 
where suspense more naturally results from the indeterminism of free will,
as dramatized by Scottie's uncertain choices, rather than the possibility
of some karmic comeuppance, irrelevant in its randomness. To fall back on
fate after establishing the solitude of freedom would be a clear retreat.
The closing scene thus mirrors the opening, completing the symmetry.
Again, we are "left hanging," this time by the inconclusive ending. The
final shot strands us at a height, showing Scottie on the tower ledge
staring down, stunned, to where Judy has fallen. The many interesting
questions the film raises about Scottie's future will go unanswered. The
double entendre of Hitchcock's opening scene, which ends with a rather
similar shot, has set us up for a magnificent cop-out, warning us, in
effect, of the film's method. On one level, Vertigo bewitches us with
eery fascination; on another, it takes us on a wild goose chase in search
of Scottie's essence, turning his heart into the ultimate MacGuffin.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: James Stewart, Kim Novak, Barbara Bel Geddes, Tom Helmore
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Producer: Alfred Hitchcock
Restoration Producers: Robert A. Harris and James C. Katz
Screenplay: Samuel Taylor and Alec Coppel based on the novel 
      D'ENTRE LES MORTS by Pierre Boileau and Thomas Narcejac
Cinematography: Robert Burks
Music: Bernard Herrmann
U.S. Distributor: Universal Pictures (original: Paramount Pictures)
     Seeing the newly-restored, 70 mm print of VERTIGO in a theater is 
an experience that no fan of Hitchcock, or of cinema in general, should 
miss.  Especially for those (like me) whose sole exposure to the film 
has been through faded, deteriorating video copies, the opportunity to 
watch the movie in a manner akin to the one intended by director Alfred 
Hitchcock comes as a great boon.  In fact, aside from the plot itself, 
there are few similarities between the shrunken, battered TV version of 
the film and this painstakingly meticulous restoration.  
     Hitchcock films in general, and VERTIGO in particular (which many 
critics view as the Master of Suspense's greatest achievement), have 
influenced an entire generation of film makers, from Martin Scorsese to 
Brian DePalma and David Lynch.  Hitchcock's innovative use of back-
screen projection and camera tricks (such as simultaneously zooming in 
and tracking out) to enhance suspense and draw the audience deeper into 
the narrative have frequently been emulated, but rarely equaled.  From a 
craft standpoint, VERTIGO represents the director in peak form.
     When observed from a contemporary, 1990s viewpoint, certain plot 
elements of VERTIGO seem dated and naive (in particular, how women and 
the justice system are viewed).  However, for the most part, the film 
holds together surprisingly well even 40 years later.  There are times 
when we're aware that VERTIGO was written for a different audience 
during an earlier era, but this doesn't necessarily detract from the 
film going experience; rather, it helps place the movie in its proper 
historical context.
     VERTIGO opens with a short prologue that details the circumstances 
under which Detective John Ferguson (James Stewart) develops an acute 
case of acrophobia that leads to vertigo whenever he climbs a steep 
flight of stairs or gets more than a few feet above the ground.  After 
leaving the police force because of this condition, John is approached 
by an old acquaintance, ship yard magnate Gavin Elster (Tom Helmore), to 
tail his wife, Madeleine (Kim Novak).  Gavin is concerned about 
Madeleine's health -- she has frequent black-outs and he believes that 
the spirit of a dead woman is attempting to possess her.
     As John follows Madeleine, watching her day after day, he falls for 
her.  Eventually, the two meet and discover that the attraction is 
mutual.  But even love is not enough to overcome John's vertigo, and he 
is unable to save her from a fall from the top of a church bell tower.  
Madeleine's death causes John to suffer a breakdown, and, during his 
recovery, a chance encounter on the street brings him face-to-face with 
a woman, Judy Barton (Novak), who is the spitting image of his dead 
love.
     Hitchcock does a masterful job blending all of VERTIGO's diverse 
elements together.  It's a love story, a mystery, and a thriller all 
rolled into one.  It deals with issues of obsession, psychological and 
physical paralysis, and the tenuous nature of romantic love.  VERTIGO 
should really be seen more than once to be fully appreciated.  Many of 
the darker, deeper aspects only begin to bubble to the surface on 
subsequent viewings.  
     Stylistically, perhaps the two most noteworthy elements of VERTIGO 
are its distinctive color scheme, which features reds and greens, and 
the memorable, haunting score turned in by composer Bernard Herrmann.  
There are numerous, lengthy passages that pass without dialogue (most of 
these occur while John is trailing Madeleine), and Herrmann's music 
sustains Hitchcock's carefully-crafted tone.  
     James Stewart is perfect for the lead in VERTIGO, playing the sort 
of role he does best -- a tremendously-likable, but otherwise ordinary 
man who finds himself caught up in extraordinary circumstances.  VERTIGO 
ranks alongside IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE and MR. SMITH GOES TO WASHINGTON 
as examples of Stewart in top form.  As an interesting side note, 
Hitchcock scholars are in general agreement that John is a subconscious 
representation of the director -- a man constantly striving for his own 
image of perfect female beauty. Kim Novak brings the right touch of 
mystery to Madeleine/Judy.  Unattainable and icy in the first role, then 
earthy and troubled in the second, Novak allows us to accept what could 
easily seem to be a cheap plot contrivance.  Barbara Bel Geddes, as 
John's good friend, Midge, and Tom Helmore, as Madeleine's husband, fill 
supporting roles.
     This restoration of VERTIGO serves two crucial purposes.  First, it 
allows all those who have loved the film over the years to once again 
(or perhaps for the first time) view the motion picture in its full 
glory.  Secondly, and more importantly, it preserves a great classic for 
future generations so that movie-goers for decades to come will be able 
to see and appreciate VERTIGO as far more than a fading, deteriorating 
piece of '50s cinema.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Brian Koller
Alfred Hitchcock directed some great films, but not every
film was great.  For example, "The Man Who Knew Too Much"
from 1956, co-starred Doris Day and seemed to be a vehicle
for her to sing "Que Sera Sera".  "Vertigo", his next
film that starred Jimmy Stewart, is considered by many
not only to be Hitchcock's best movie, but by some to
be the best movie ever.
With this in mind, I was frustrated by the first half of
the movie.  In the opening scene, Stewart and a fellow
cop are chasing a villian across rooftops.  Stewart slips,
and hangs onto a gutter for dear life.  The other cop
tries to help him, but falls to his death.  The next scene,
Stewart is safe on the ground again.  We never learn how
Stewart, in that precarious position with his terrifying 
fear of heights, got down from that rooftop safely.
The plot then moves quite slowly.  Stewart retires from
the force, flirts with his would-be girlfriend Midge (who needs
better fashion sense), and is hired by old pal Gavin to follow
his mournful, suicidal wife (Kim Novak) around.  Things certainly 
take their time as Stewart learns she has a fixation with a
long-dead woman who had committed suicide.  Stewart befriends
her, and falls in love with her.  Stewart's galpal is jealous,
but no matter, since she has only a few scenes in the movie
anyway.
Novak and Stewart visit a Sequoia tree forest.  They are
apparently the only people there.  Later, at a mission
preserved as a tourist trap, again, they are the only
ones there.  Not even employees are to be seen.  When a couple 
goes to a restaurant in the movies, the restaurant is usually 
full of people.  When they visit a scenic site, however, the 
couple is often the only ones there.  Well, maybe I'm just 
being cranky.
Novak describes a dream she had.  Stewart is able to recognize
it as an old restored mission a hundred miles away.  They
go there, and after a tender love scene, Novak runs up the
mission's tower and apparently jumps to her death, however...
It later turns out that: 1). Novak is an actress playing
Gavin's wife. 2). Novak is having an affair with Gavin.
3). Novak did not jump off the tower.  Instead, Gavin was
waiting there, with his already-murdered wife, and pushes
her off instead.
The audience is supposed to buy this incredible set-up
because it is delivered as a surprise.  But a movie is not
great simply because it has a few surprises.  Especially if
those surprises are preposterous.  Gavin apparently takes
his wife to the mission, takes her to the mission tower,
kills her there, waits for Stewart to show up with Novak,
waits for Novak to run up the stairs, knowing that Stewart
won't run up because he is afraid of heights, waits until
the post-jump commotion is over, then leaves the mission with
Novak dressed up as the wife.  With no one seeing him at
the mission with his wife or Novak, and without the coroner
discovering the murder.  How Novak was able to contact
Gavin to tell him when Stewart would arrive isn't revealed.
After the murder, what if Stewart saw a photo of the wife
in the paper or TV?  He would have known it was a set-up.
It is a different movie after Novak's jump.  The pace finally
picks up, and there is more tension.  Problems remain,
however, with character development and motivation.
Stewart is devastated by Novak's apparent death.  He has a
bizarre nightmare that has scenes of Stewart falling, flashing
red lights, and Stewart's disembodied head superimposed on weird 
animation.  Upon waking, Stewart goes into a catatonic state, and 
ends up in some sort of institution.  He's only there for one scene, 
however.  A doctor tells Midge that he might not recover for two 
years.  Next scene, however, Stewart is prowling the street.
Unless I blinked, it isn't explained how Stewart got his act
together again.
Wouldn't you know it, Stewart spots a girl who looks alot
like Novak.  She has a different hairstyle, hair color, and
fashion sense.  You'd think that he would shake it off
as a coincidence, especially given his fixation with her.
But no, he knocks on her apartment door, checks on her ID
(she's Judy Barton), asks her to go out with him, then asks her 
to quit her job, then dresses her up as Novak, even dying her hair 
the same color.  It turns out that this woman is Novak.  She must 
be a very pliable woman, as she gives in to all the endless demands 
both Gavin and Stewart make of her.  Instead of saying no,
she just gets breathless with excitement.  She also must like
older men, since Gavin and Stewart are both a quarter century
older than her.
Stewart recognizes a necklace that Judy is wearing as one that
Novak wore.  Instead of accepting this as a coincidence,
Stewart makes the incredible deduction that Novak impersonated
Gavin's wife, that Gavin killed his wife, and Novak and Gavin
had an affair.  Instead of going to the police, Stewart takes
Novak to the scene of the crime, fighting his vertigo and 
dragging the reluctant Novak up the stairs as he cross-examines 
her.  When finally suprised by a nun, Novak jumps off the tower 
(would you have?  Didn't think so) leaving Stewart gaping as the 
credits roll.
Now, it could be that I am a fault-finding grouch who
missed the point.  Or, it could be that others are overly
impressed by the Hitchcock and Stewart names, silly dream 
sequences and dubious surprises.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Dragan Antulov
Sometimes films can be like wine - getting better as they
age. Such examples are, however, very rare and author of
this review can name only few examples of films he
considered better with each subsequent viewing. One of such
films was VERTIGO, 1958 thriller, often mentioned as the
best among many films directed by great Alfred Hitchcock and
one of the greatest films ever made. When I saw this film
for the first time I was not that impressed. Actually, I was
quite disappointed - although VERTIGO looked like a truly
great film, something was missing and I began thinking about
it as one of those overhyped films which filmophiles are
supposed to worship even if they don't particularly like
them. On the second viewing, I began changing my mind about
VERTIGO after discovering some new elements in the films and
looking it from different perspective. My view on VERTIGO
improved and continued to improve after each viewing. Every
time I discovered something new and gradually became
convinced that VERTIGO meets all requirements for cinematic
masterpiece.
VERTIGO was made during the zenith of Hitchcock's career,
with his reputation of great filmmaker already established.
Two French authors, Pierre Boileau and Thomas Narcejac, have
written the novel D'ENTRE LES MORTS especially for
Hitchcock. Hitchcock used the plot of the novel after
adaptations by Samuel A. Taylor and Alec Coppel. Protagonist
of VERTIGO is John "Scottie" Ferguson (played by James
Stewart), San Francisco police detective who discovers that
he suffers from acrophobia while chasing the crime suspect
on rooftops. The chase would end with one of the uniformed
policemen dead and Scottie, traumatised for life, decides to
leave the force. Few months later, he is called by an old
college friend and shipping tycoon Gavin Elster (played by
Tom Helmore) who wants to hire him as a private detective.
Scottie's job is to look after Elster's wife Madeleine
(played by Kim Novak), who is acting strangely, struck with
unhealthy obsession with Carlotta Valdez, woman who took her
own life in San Francisco a century ago. Scottie begins
following Madeleine and gradually falls in love with her.
But his love is weaker than his acrophobia, and he can't
save Madeleine's life when she jumps from the high bell
tower. Stricken with grief, remorse and guilty conscience
Scottie wanders through streets of San Francisco until he
finds Judy Barton (again played by Kim Novak), ordinary girl
who is looking somewhat similar to Madeleine. His interest
in Judy is motivated only by memory of lost love, but young
girl has her own skeletons in the closet.
VERTIGO represents Hitchcock at his best - a great artist
who is willing to experiment while being faithful to his
trademark style in the same time. Result of his efforts is
the film with multiple layers that could satisfy both those
who worship Hitchcock as the king of suspense thrillers and
those who aren't particularly attracted to the genre. Again,
as in many films from this period of Hitchcock's career,
VERTIGO is suspense thriller on surface only. Hitchcock uses
thriller plot only as an opportunity to explore various
forms of human conditions, especially those, which are
considered bizarre, aberrant or downright perverse.
Therefore, VERTIGO should be viewed less as a thriller and
more like a combination of powerful love story and intense
psychological drama. Hitchcock's ability to put all those
contents within the framework of thriller is another reason
why VERTIGO happens to be one of the most celebrated (and
quoted) films in the history of cinema.
VERTIGO is film worshipped by critics and film scholars, but
I doubt that the general audience could share their
enthusiasm. This is probably due to the fact that VERTIGO
happens to be very dark, by many standards the darkest and
most depressing film Hitchcock has ever made. Sinister
dimension of the film could be already found in the
character of protagonist. For many people, James Stewart's
role in this film is one of the most successful
transformations of the actor's image - once good
all-American boy was already playing people with extremely
unpleasant character traits, but John "Scottie" Ferguson
represents the bottom of the barrel. In REAR WINDOW, another
Hitchcock's classic, Stewart played voyeuristic
photographer, but this aberration from societal norms was
something almost acceptable and within the framework of
Hitchcockian formula of "ordinary man in extraordinary
circumstances". But this time Stewart plays character that
is anything but ordinary - Scottie Ferguson is actually
textbook example of various psychopathological conditions.
Pathological fear of heights is the least of his problems,
as well as his inability to deal with women. As the plot
progresses, we see protagonist revealing his darker side.
First we are introduced to his maniacal obsession on the
verge of stalking. Than Hitchcock hints about necrophilia -
Ferguson is attracted to Madeleine less because of her
beauty and more because she is cold and distant, and in one
scene it is implied that he might have had his way with her
while she was unconscious. Finally, in the second part of
film, after being diagnosed as chronic depressive, he shows
his worst side as someone who wants total control over his
sex object. Stewart shows these character traits
uncompromisingly, but the audience is still having some
sympathy for Scottie - this is the reason why the role in
VERTIGO represents the greatest achievement in Stewart's
acting career. Ironically, this role was, according to many
film scholars, inspired by Hitchcock himself - Scottie's
makeover of Judy was in many ways similar to the ordeals
suffered by lead actresses during production of Hitchcock's
films.
The actress who was subjected to such makeover for the
purposes of this film was Kim Novak, one of numerous blonde
sex symbols of 1950s Hollywood whose reputation led many
critics to disregard her genuine acting talent and give all
credit for the success of her role to Hitchcock himself. Kim
Novak played the difficult dual role of Madeleine/Judy with
great success, and it is understandably the best acting
performance of her career, achievement that couldn't be
possible without some true talent. In most likelihood,
critics and film scholars were discouraged from praising her
achievement for the same reason why general audience
wouldn't like this film - her characters are equally dark
and dysfunctional as male protagonist. At first we are
introduced to the woman who is slowly but inevitably
succumbing to self- destructive madness only to see her
reincarnation in seemingly ordinary woman who repeats the
same process. But the most sinister revelation of her
character happens in the end of the film, when Judy not only
voluntarily puts herself through utmost humiliation of
abusive relationship, but also hints that she went through
this before. This depiction of female protagonist as passive
and powerless toy in the hands of morally or sexually
aberrant men is probably the reason why modern-day feminists
shouldn't be too enthusiastic about Novak or Hitchcock.
Some critics tend to claim that VERTIGO can't be masterpiece
because of various plot holes and implausibilties. Those
nit-picks, however, usually point to main characters doing
things or acting in a way normal and ordinary people would
not. But the main characters are already marked as
dysfunctional and nearly psychotic. Because of that they are
more interesting than the supporting, more "normal"
characters, and, consequently, supporting actors are
shadowed by great performances by Stewart and Novak. One of
the exceptions are Barbara Bell Geddes as Marjorie "Midge"
Wood, charming but nerdish friend and ex-fianc‚e of Scottie,
who would provide the only traces of comic relief in this
grim tale. Another is Henry Jones as coroner whose harsh but
nevertheless correct depiction of Scottie's mental state
make him some kind of Greek chorus. While drafting a
villain, Hitchcock again threw away his formula about bad
guys being more interested than protagonists. Gavin Elster
might be manipulative and ruthless bastard, but his
psychology is too normal for Hitchcock; as a result, Tom
Helmore doesn't have to work hard playing him and,
furthermore, Hitchcock simply dumps that character half way
during the him and, in doing so, breaks Hollywood rules
about villains getting away with their crimes.
The acting alone, however, isn't the only reason why VERTIGO
should be considered a masterpiece. Again, like in many
other occasions, Hitchcock showed his great talent of superb
filmmaker, always ready to employ new filming techniques and
create memorable scenes and images. In case of VERTIGO
Hitchcock uses splendid photography by Robert Burke and the
camera rarely leaves the protagonist, which gives a plenty
opportunity for Hitchcock to employ various techniques with
lenses, different lighting (and even some animation during
dream sequences) in order to present the protagonist's
twisted state of mind. San Francisco locations and memorable
music by Bernard Herrmann creates specific, almost surreal
atmosphere of the film - another reason why VERTIGO is
considered one of the everlasting Hitchcockian masterpieces.
Review written on September 22nd 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Author
Ian Low
In the pantheon of film making, there are undoubtable classics that stand
out as monumental artifacts of this art form. Some of these remain the
standards where new films are measured against and even imitated upon.
Citizen Kane, Casablanca and Lawrence of Arabia are such examples of a great
tradition of movie making that have been widely praised, liked and even
analyzed upon in countless books and articles. Yet, legendary as these films
are, there is one motion picture that has reached the heights of such
similar classic status, but still remains as one of the least conspicuous
among its more illustrious peers. I am referring to Alfred Hitchcock's
Vertigo.
Released to muted reviews and disappointing box office receipts, Vertigo has
since gained much respect and admiration from all aspects of the film
community. Ranging from film historians to the casual fan, Vertigo has now
deservedly taken its place among Hitchcock's other classic films as one of
the most intriguing of all thriller movies. And certainly, one of the most
personal films ever to have emerged from arguably, the best director in this
business. Beginning with this movie, Hitchcock managed to create a trilogy
of films in successive years that is perhaps, the most remarkable ever
attempted by any director. North By Northwest, Psycho and Vertigo feature
frequently among critics' best of lists and represents the culmination of
Hitchcock's prowess, as well as showcasing his brilliant skills as a
film-maker and his extensive knowledge of the language of the cinema.
Part of the mystique of the movie stems from the fact that it is misleading
the viewer right from the beginning, the plot seemingly about how James
Stewart's character, Scottie Ferguson tries to prevent "Madeline", played by
Kim Novak, from succumbing to a supernatural force that threatens to possess
and ultimately, overwhelms her. This deception is carried on brilliantly by
both the performances and the usually taut direction that Hitchcock imposes
on the entire picture. It is not until the middle third of the movie, that
Hitchcock surprisingly reveals the mystery in a fashion that completely
catches the viewer off guard. From there on, the film shifts to a more
personal tone of undesirable and questionable obsession on Scottie's part to
transform Judy back into his dream woman that was "Madeline". Yet, the
"Madeline" that he seeks never existed at all. It is this irony that
provides this film with its unique, almost surrealistic tone and among
Hitchcock's works, this is the film that is at once darkly depressing as it
is revealingly autobiographical.
Jimmy Stewart has always been known to play the charming and effervescent
American ordinary everyday guy, a role that is similarly typified by Tom
Hanks today. His winsome smile garnered him with his only Academy award in
The Philadelphia Story and his even more famous turn as George Bailey in
Capra's It's A Wonderful Life cemented Stewart as the quintessential
American hero. A face and a style that any American and even non-American
can identify with. But since he began to work with Hitchcock, Jimmy Stewart
began a series of roles that played him against type and character.
In Rear Window, Stewart's L.B. Jefferies's character begins the film as a
restless voyeuristic photographer. But by the end of the movie, one tends to
forget this questionable aspect of his character as he manages to solve a
murder mystery in the process. In Vertigo, however, Stewart plays a
character that displays even more flaws then the Jefferies character could
ever have. At the beginning, he faces seemingly increasing difficulty in
overcoming his fear of heights that was triggered off by his guilt towards
causing the death of a fellow police officer. Hitchcock then pulls off an
incredible delusion to the audience by deliberately misleading us into
thinking that Scottie Ferguson will conquer his fear by falling in love and
by resolving the mystery that surrounds "Madeline".
For all his reputation for suspense and thriller films, Hitchcock's ultimate
masterpiece does not focus on those two aspects as he does on the personal
aspects of his two main characters in the picture. We are allowed a glimpse
into the director's mindset and dare I say it, his emotions as he molded
Scottie and "Madeline" into human beings that seem at once, frightfully true
to life and yet, almost dreamlike in pure visual terms. As the audience, we
can certainly identify with Scottie's pursuit of his perfect woman as at one
time or another, each one of us had probably wanted to find that same person
who can fulfill our ultimate fantasies. The difference is, Scottie manages
to come close.
Only close, because his fantasy woman is after all, a masquerade fabricated
by his longtime friend Gavin Elster to deliberately lead Scottie into his
murderous scheme as an unknowing accomplice and also, as a convenient
scapegoat and alibi. Judy, the woman who plays the role of "Madeline" is
nothing like the "Madeline" that Scottie envisions. The real Judy is a more
earthly woman that seems at once materialistic and bubbly, which contrasts
strikingly with the icy cold blonde that is "Madeline", who simply emanates
with stylish sophistication. But Scottie is never let into this revelation
as early as the audience, so from the moment the truth is made known to the
viewer, we are made to observe and follow his emotional trauma in losing
"Madeline" and then the joy of rediscovering her in the form of Judy.
The beauty of the picture lies not in watching it for the first time, but
from subsequent viewings, when the audience has the intimate knowledge of
what has happened. The first half of the movie then takes on multiple layers
of meanings and and it becomes a responsibility for the viewer to understand
how difficult it is for Kim Novak to play Judy who herself is playing
"Madeline". Her movements and gestures are even more impressive with the
realization that she herself is putting up an act of deception and deceit.
Yet, from the moment Scottie fishes her out of the waters of the Golden Gate
bridge, the audience can almost identify with the extreme restraint that is
evident in Judy's eyes and that keeps her from revealing herself to Scottie.
Later in Scottie's apartment, we are already well aware of the ruse that
Judy is putting up for him. It is convincing to the point that the first
time viewer is totally taken in by the deception. You could believe that she
was suffering from amnesia, seemingly possessed by a "supernatural spirit"
that guides her through the various locations of San Francisco. But seeing
it the second time, notice how Novak manages to "act" surprised and shocked
in waking up naked in Scottie's room. But for all intents and purposes, she
"lets" him bring her there and even "lets" him undresses her in a deliberate
attempt to delude him. Throughout the whole charade, Scottie is completely
oblivious to the fact that she "knows". It is this idea of irony and
deceptive role-play that gives this film an unusual aural of mystery and
surrealistic romantiscm.
This is a romance that is unlikely, yet when it does finally occur, at the
cliffs where Judy almost overacts her part, we are already under the
impression that Scottie is in love with her. Simultaneously, we are equally
convinced that Judy, masquerading as "Madeline" is also falling for him. The
Hitchcockian touch at resolving this romance is sheer genius as it breaks
new ground in the way it treat film lovers on screen. Electing not to
provide an avenue for the doomed lovers to escape from, he decides to end
the picture almost abruptly at the infamous bell tower scene. It is the same
exact spot where earlier on, Scottie first witnesses the "suicidal" fall of
Elster's real wife. The same exact scene where Scottie relives his guilt at
being unable to prevent a certain death due to his vertigo.
A guilt which is unfairly burdened upon him the second time round as he is
only playing a pawn in the midst of a greater murderous scheme. A scheme
that involves Judy as "Madeline", a common girl hired by Elster because her
looks probably resemble that of Elster's wife. A guilt which would be
further complicated by the realization that Judy would herself find herself
falling hopelessly for him. At the end of the picture, Hitchcock has to
submit Scottie to one last trauma at the bell tower. Right at the moment
when Scottie is faced with the most difficult decision of his life, of
whether or not to bring Judy to justice or simply carry on the deception and
let the past slip by. The appearance of the nun at the top of the bell tower
is an inspired decision, a decision apparently made by Samuel Taylor, the
main scriptwriter for the film.
A nun represents God, and if the ending is abrupt, the resolvement of Judy's
involvement in the murder of the actual "Madeline" is to symbolize the
cliched notion that criminals may escape the hands of the law, but not from
the hand of God. Her apparent accidental fall may be even more symbolic in
the sense that she is re-enacting what she was asked to do by Elster, to
pretend to fall to her death to mask the death and murder of his actual
wife. The terrific irony here again is she is not acting, but really "doing"
it this time. Falling to her own death, which is as real as Elster's wife
death was. With that, the film concludes with the everlasting image of
Stewart's Scottie standing at the bell tower, looking down on the lifeless
body of his de-mystified obsession, a woman who never existed for him. A
woman who was manufactured for the purpose of a diabolical crime, and a
woman was in turn, re-manufactured by the very same man she was supposed to
deceive.
The re-fashioning of Judy into "Madeline" is itself, worthy of much
discussion. The main focal point becomes that of Judy being willing to
subject herself to a second of time of role-playing. But whereas the first
was due to financial and material benefits, possibly from Elster himself,
the second was unquestionably due to the purpose of pleasing Scottie. For by
the time she was "rediscovered", the audience can sense her love for him.
This is most clearly demonstrated in her reluctance to leave him a goodbye
note explaining the whole crime, and willing to play a second round of
charade with Scottie. And even after voicing her objections to being
remodeled, she eventually subjects herself to Scottie's almost unhealthy
desire to see and possess "Madeline" back in the form of another woman who
"happens" to look like her. This possession obsession at one time becomes
almost surreal. Look at the scene when she finally emerges from the bathroom
as the completed "product".
Roger Ebert calls this the single best shot or sequence that Hitchcock has
ever done, and I am very inclined to agree. The ghostlike green glow serves
as a haunting, almost hallucinating background to Novak's "Madeline" as she
proceeds with almost torturous pace towards Scottie. Their eyes locked in
almost twin emotions of elation and pain. Elation because both have
ultimately satisfied each other's desires. She, because she believes he will
finally accept her, and he, because the woman he thought he had "lost" so
dramatically and tragically has finally returned. In a scene where there is
no background or ambient noise, just images and Bernard Herrmann's stirring
and hauntingly romantic score, it is the ultimate piece of pure cinema
anyone has since or will ever conjure up. The moment the two tragic lovers
lock and embrace, the camera circles around the both of them, and as it does
so, images of San Juan Batista emerge from behind them, as if to indicate
that the past has caught up with the present, and later will engulf them to
a powerfully emotional and tragic end. Yet, Scottie clings on to her as if
he never has lost her, and he is at once willing to believe that she is the
same "Madeline" that he has fallen for during the first part of the film. He
hesitates only for a brief moment, but once he is convinced that she is
"genuine", he embraces her with the utmost of passion that has yet been
captured on celluloid.
Perhaps, the optimist would have hoped the film should have ended there. But
then, there is always the moral issue of not letting characters getting away
with blatant crime, especially when it involves murder. For us, for
Hitchcock, the resolution of this film represents one of the best climatic
endings to a motion picture. Dark, emotional, tense and frightful, these are
the emotions that one goes through together with the two leads as they
ascend the steps of the bell tower. Of course, the innovative "Vertigo" shot
heightens the tension and gives us a visual simulation of what Scottie is
feeling as he looks down towards the depths of the stairs. As Scottie
unravels the truth, a truth where Novak's character and the audience are
already well aware of, we see his expression of anger and of passion at the
same time. Emotions which would have been overplayed by any other actor,
Jimmy Stewart manages to convince us equally of his confusion, his guilt,
his hurt and his ultimate love for a fabled "woman" from which there is no
turning back from. As he reaches the top, he is ultimately faced with his
own strong belief of upholding the law, and his equally passionate feelings
for a woman who has deceived him and yet, now offer the only real hope of
redemption and his only compromised opportunity for a perfect love. And as
he contemplates his decision for either justice or love, he is cruelly
robbed of that decision as Judy accidentally plunges towards her own demise,
a justice meted out by perhaps, in equally "supernatural" manner.
As a motion picture, Vertigo possesses all the necessary technical
credentials for a 1958 film. George Tomasini's taut editing, Robert Burks's
elegant cinematography, Saul Bass's innovative and hypnotic title designs
and of course, Herrmann's score. The importance of how music affects a film
has never been understated. Yet somehow, Herrmann's musical soundtrack
manages to bring images that Burk's camera could not even capture. The
haunting title theme elicits both terror and romance simultaneously, and it
is this musical picture that gives the audience a glance into the movie's
contents right at the beginning of the credits. Coupled this with the eerie
logos supplied creatively by Bass and extreme close-ups of the woman's lips
and eye, Vertigo manages to evoke the entire atmosphere of the film in the
first few minutes. Herrmann's score is never catchy or tuneful, just long
stretches of mesmerizing moods and ambience that complements both story and
performances to perfection. At times overbearing, at times tender, this is
music that lives up to the high expectations of the director and his actors.
Pure cinema such as this could not have been created without the musical
strains of Bernard Herrmann and the striking photography of Burk and
Hitchcock.
Artistically, films like Citizen Kane and A Birth Of A Nation may have
displayed much more cinematic invention in terms of camera techniques and
other technical innovations. Vertigo however, propels the film medium
further by taking the established cinematic approaches and transcends them
by exploring the human emotion on celluloid. To accomplish this requires a
director of immense knowledge and skill, and a touch of brilliance. Further,
a set of actors who are able to translate the written script into film and
then expand on it by giving their own unique touch of humanity and
expression. Alfred Hitchcock, James Stewart and Kim Novak together with
Samuel Taylor and the crew of Vertigo created a cinematic milestone in 1958
and like the aforementioned film classics, it ranks as a motion picture
masterpiece worthy of the highest accolades. In generations to come, Vertigo
will only serve as a reminder to the art of the motion picture . or in
Hitchcock's preference, the art of pure cinema.

Author
Dave Cowen
Currently making the rounds in major market cities, the new 70mm
restoration of Alfred Hitchcock's VERTIGO is playing to packed 
houses.  While the film has been given the title "masterpiece"
by many, and the restoration is one of the most expensive ever
done, both VERTIGO and its restoration prove to be mixed blessings --
mostly impressive, but occasionally dissapointing.  
VERTIGO tells the tale of John Ferguson (JAMES STEWART), known as
Scottie to his aquaintances, an ex-cop who during a chase over the
rooftops witnessed a fellow officer plummet to his doom.  This has
had a tremendous impact on Scottie, now suffering vertigo when going
as far as a couple of steps on his friend Midge's (Barbara Bel 
Geddes) stepstool, thereby taking him "out of action."  Soon, after
a call from old college chum Gavin Elster (Tom Helmore), Scottie
is back on the prowl watching over Elster's wife Madeleine (Kim 
Novak) who appears to be possessed by unnatural spirits.  As Scottie
becomes more and more drawn into the case, by the stunning third act, 
the film abandons the guise of being a "thriller" and becomes a 
psychological drama focusing on the obsessive relationship between 
Kim Novak's character and Scottie.  
This last third of VERTIGO is what makes it a classic: the motivations
behind the Rube Goldberg contraption of the plot that dominates the
first and second acts are revealed, the story is explained, and the
film is left to examine the feelings present between Novak and Stewart.  
The portrait VERTIGO paints of love is a frightening one, one based
more on obsession and image than one of understanding or companionship.
As Scotty's desire for the image of Madeleine grows, he placates
these feelings by dominating Judy Barton (also played by Kim Novak), 
shaping and modelling her back into the image of Madeleine that he 
desires, seemingly without care for her real feelings or respect for 
her personality.  Amazingly, Stewart allows us to remains sympathetic 
with Scottie throughout the film, and it's easy to understand how the 
character's actions are motivated.  Kim Novak plays a wonderful dual 
performance with a tremendous amount of range, believable both as the 
frigid Madeleine and the earthy Judy.  
Unfortunately, the first two thirds of the film take the viewer
through a setup which teeters on the absurd -- and that seems  
unnecessary complex and convoluted, as if Hitchcock were bound 
by the requirement to make a mystery full of red herrings.  The 
first half of the film also has a pacing that many have described 
as "dreamlike", but could also be considered unnecessarily 
slow-paced.  These detractions, however, are worth sitting through
to reach the supurb final act.
While I consider the restoration of VERTIGO to be a noble and 
worthy project, I feel that the restorers made some grave errors.
While the film seems brighter and more colorful in the outdoors
scenes, it often seems artificially dark and grainy indoors.  The
grain itself is often a problem even in the light scenes: despite
the restoration, the print is far from pristine.  In the first
few seconds of many scenes, colors will shift dramatically from
dark to light, or there is excessive noise on the print.  While
I realize that the lengths to which a film can be restored 
depends on the material that the restoration crew is working with,
and that there certainly is an improvement, the picture quality 
of VERTIGO seems underwhelming when compared with, for example,
the recent release of the restored TAXI DRIVER.
Bernard Herrmann's jarring score to VERTIGO sounds spectacular 
in stereo, but the foley work is distracting: certain sounds 
seem much brighter and clearly defined than others, and many new 
sound effects seem unnecessary.  Scuffling footsteps, jingling 
handbags and ocean waves seem overly "bright" sounding and are 
too loud in the mix, to an extent that I caught myself laughing 
unintentionally at some of the new sound effects.  Hopefully, 
if released on video, Universal will have an engineer EQ the 
sound effects tracks again to let them sound more in place with 
the dialogue and location. 
Despite these qualms, the new 70mm Vertigo is definately worth
seeing -- catch it while you can.
-- 
signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david     h t t p : / /w w w . f i s c h e . c o m
(esch@fische.com) ------------------------------------------------------

Author
Chad Polenz
1958 original version: not rated, 128 minutes [2 hours, 8 minutes]
1996 restored version: PG, 129 minutes [2 hours, 9 minutes]
starring: James Stewart (John "Scottie" Ferguson), Kim Novak (Madeleine
Elster, Judy Barton), Barbara Bel Geddes (Midge Wood), Tom Helmore (Gavin
Elster); written by Alec Copperl, Samuel Taylor, produced and directed by
Alfred Hitchcock, based on the novel "D'Entre les Morts" by Pierre Boileau,
Thomas Narcejac.
They say you know you're going crazy when you think you're normal and the
rest of the world is insane. That's the feeling I got watching "Vertigo," a
pseudo epic story about love, betrayal, classic irony, but most of all
insanity. To truly appreciate the film one must realize all the characters
are insane, and yet still sympathize with them and that's just an unrealistic
expectation.
The story starts off in an interesting manner by introducing us to John
"Scottie" Ferguson, a San Franciso detective who forced himself to retire
after a traumatic incident left him with a permanent sense of agoraphobia
(fear of heights). While at his friend Midge's (Bel Geddes) apartment, he
wonders if he can beat his phobia if he takes it a little bit at a time,
unfortunately, he can't. The film makes such a point of showing his
agoraphobia, it's obvious it will be vital to the plot at some point (hence
the title), especially as some kind of ultimate weakness.
Most of the first act involves interaction between Scottie and Midge and his
old college alum, Gavin Elster (Helmore). Elster hasn't seen Scottie in years
but feels he is the only one who can help him. He believes his wife has
become possessed by some kind of supernatural entity and he wants Scottie to
follow her to see what she does and where she goes. Scottie scoffs at
Elster's notion, but decides to take the case anyway. Here is where the
essential aspect of the film kicks in, but the direction the film takes is a
misguided one. It sets up an entire plotline which will later be revealed as
one big illusion, that is, if you don't figure it out first.
And so Scottie embarks upon his quest, following Madeleine Elster (Novak)
from her home, to a florist, to a cemetery, to an art museum, and back home.
Little happens in terms of plot development, and much of the middle act seems
to serve no purpose. You have to wonder why Madeleine never suspects she is
being followed, and why Scottie doesn't try very hard to be silent and
invisible. Her wandering leaves clues to her behavior, which Scottie pieces
together (but not through any interesting detective work). He believes she
thinks she is possessed by the spirit of her great grandmother, whose
portrait she stares at in the museum and whose tombstone she leaves flowers.
In the spirit of such epic-yet-subtle romances, it's clear this film is not
everything it seems. When Scottie saves Madeleine from a suicidal drowning
attempt, it's obvious the two are in love when she is revived. I refuse to
accept love could occur between these characters, especially through such
generic motions. This is one of those films where you're not supposed to
realize the two barely know each other (even after they start spending time
together), because the romance will later lead to more profound themes. The
fact the film condones what is seemingly adultery is also quite twisted.
I'm not sure how to describe the sudden shift the film takes about halfway
and two-thirds through. Basically, everything that happened was just a
conspiracy perpetrated by Elster to cover up the murder of his wife so he
could be with his lover. I'm sure this is an attempt at telling a story of a
perfect crime spoiled by love, but upon close examination it doesn't seem
that way. This is where you realize the main characters must be insane
because of the trouble they go through when easier, simpler methods are
available. But the point of the film is not the conspiracy, it is simply an
allegory for the most tragic of romances, that is, a supposedly perfect one
which never really existed.
The final act is like a completely separate film, but the central themes
carry over. It's inspirational in one way as it seems like a classic Greek
myth happening in modern times. But this is also why the film fails: its
usage of the classical elements are so obvious and predictable they seem more
cheesy and stupid than thematic.
In fact, if there's any reason this film is sub-standard, it's due to the
poor storytelling. Hitchcock is supposed to be a master of suspense, but I
often found myself restless and bored. Most of the performances are
satisfactory, but the motions the characters go through are dull and
repetitive. 
"Vertigo" is just so dependent upon its themes it fails to be entertaining
as a film. It's just too bizarre to take seriously... or however we're
supposed to see it.
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz - over 150
new and old movies reviewed in depth, not just blind ratings and quick
capsules. Also, check out The FIRST Shay Astar Web Page @ http://members.aol.c
om/ChadPolenz/ShayAstar.html

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
The easiest way to identify a master filmmaker is to observe
how well his or her work holds up to multiple viewings. All too
often a story's luster fades quickly--even a movie beloved
during the initial screening can feel stale and formulaic the
second time around. The rare film which actually demands more
attention on subsequent viewings is to be cherished indeed.
Vertigo may not be Alfred Hitchcock's best film, but it's
probably his richest--the one that keeps calling us back for
further analysis, the one hardest to release from our minds
after the end credits roll. The story, adapted from the French
novel D'Entre Les Morts (From Among the Dead), is certainly one
of cinema's most compelling, as famous for its magnificent
construction as its actual entertainment value. A rich
masterpiece of macabre obsession, Vertigo is not so much a
movie as a web that entangles and ensnares both the characters
and audience.
John "Scottie" Ferguson (played by Hitchcock regular James
Stewart, in the last film they would make together) is a
detective who leaves the force after a near-fatal misstep
during a rooftop chase leaves him with an incapacitating fear
of heights. Having little to occupy his time, Scottie answers a
plea for help from an old college friend, Gavin Elster (Tom
Helmore). Elster confides to Scottie that his (Elster's) wife,
Madeleine, may be in danger:
The complete review is located free of charge at:
 http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/vertigo.htm

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Samuel A. Taylor and Alec Coppel (from the book "Entre Les
Morts" by Pierre Boileu and Thomas Narcejac)
Starring: James Stewart, Kim Novak, Babara Del Geddes
On the surface, "Vertigo" looks like a manipulative jokester of a movie,
constantly giving you ideas, then turning the exact opposite direction
with them, frustrating you.  Then, of course, half way through, the film
pulls a 180, chaning the underlying mood from a detective mystery film
to a sick obsession flick.  But the second half is merely fueled by the
first half, which presents the idea of sexual obsession then goes full
blast with it in the second half.
When "Vertigo" initially came out in the 50s, it was criticized for many
of the same things I said in the first paragraph.  Manipulative. 
Stupid.  Not enough suspense.  But a couple years later, people finally
GOT the film, and now it's a classic.  This film is not to be watched
literally, but to be watched introspectively.  Everything this film is
about is beyond the surface, inbedded in symbolism and theme, creating a
film that is not just one of Hitchcock's best, but probably his most
personal film.
The story centers around a detective named Scottie (James Stewart), who
suffers a massive tragedy when he and another cop are chasing a crook on
rooftops in San Francisco, and he nearly tumbles to his death, only to
watch as the cop who tries to save him falls to his own demise.  From
this, he receives a nasty dose of achrophobia, fear of heights, which
gives him vertigo, which is dizziness, which is exactly what Hitchcock
takes us through.
Stewart is hired by an old college chum a bit later to follow his wife
(Kim Novak), who seems to have developed a bit of insanity, and wanders
off aimlessly, and turns out to believe she is her great-grandmother, a
woman who went insane and killed herself.  As Scottie spies on her, he
becomes more and more obsessed with her, and after he saves her when she
tries to drown herself, he falls deeper in love with her.  Until one day
when fate steps in with her bit of insanity, and at a monestary in
California, she runs to the top of a bell tower, and throws herself to
the ground, all while Scottie is crippled on the stairs by his fear of
heights.
Scottie enters a deep ravine of depression, but one day sees a woman who
looks just like her (also Kim Novak), just a brunette.  He approaches
her, and they begin dating.  Of course, it turns out she was really the
other woman, and was posing as the original so the husband could kill
her and get away with it.  Now, this is pretty hard to swallow, I know,
but do yourself a favor, and don't get hung up on it.  The really great
part is yet to come.
What happens is Scottie and her are really in love, but Scottie's really
in love with what she was pretending to be, since she was the one he had
to follow.  So, he begins to transform her into her, buying her the
exact same dresses, dying her hair, and making her look exactly like
her.  His obsession reaches its fullest when she emerges from the
bathroom in a room lit by neon lights from outside, looking exactly like
the original.  It's one of the most frightening and brilliant scenes in
movie history.
This is, of course, a metaphor for the way Hitchcock had to mold women
into these women they really aren't, to satisfy himself.  He had, I
suppose, felt horrible about the ways he screwed with these women's
personalities, and dumped them for another one.  In most of Hitchcock's
films, the events were a metaphor for something else, but this is one of
the most disturbing ones.  The film is not really a great suspense film,
but really a fantastic introspective drama into the mind of a person
much like the master of suspense himself.
P.S. Make sure you get the widescreen remastered/reissued version that
came out this year.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Kevin Patterson
Alfred Hitchcock's "Vertigo" is the rare top-flight, well-acclaimed film that
succeeds despite a somewhat weak screenplay. While many modern movies throw
logic out the window in the name of  pointless action sequences and
explosions, "Vertigo" throws it out the window for the sake of emotional
resonance, ironic twists, and thematic coherence. The film is based on a
French novel, which makes me think that Hitchcock decided he wanted to adapt
the novel to film but hired screenwriters who, while careful to preserve the
most essential themes, failed to fit these themes into a tighter plot.
It is fortunate, then, that Hitchcock and his leads, James Stewart and Kim
Novak, seem to know exactly what they're doing here, because a less competent
team of director and actors would have ended up with little more than a
muddled psychological thriller. Instead, they deliver what starts out as an
intriguing mystery and turns into a tragic love story, a story of a doomed
romance based on deceptive appearances and obsession rather than on real
understanding or emotional connection. Hitchcock is known as the  "master of
suspense," but it is the final half hour of the film, after the mystery has
evaporated and the film focuses on the relationship between two desolate and
frankly sick characters, that is the most powerful.
As the film begins, we are introduced to ex-police detective John "Scotty"
Ferguson (Stewart), who has quit the force after an incident in which another
officer was killed in a high-altitude chase due to Scotty's fear of heights
and resulting inability to climb a roof. Scotty is approached by a friend of
his who claims that his wife Madeline (Novak) has been behaving strangely and
may be possessed by the spirit of a suicidal Hispanic woman from the 19th
century. Scotty reluctantly agrees to follow her and report back on her
activities so as to ascertain the cause of her odd behavior. Before long,
however, he develops a romantic obsession with Madeline, and when he saves her
from an apparent suicide attempt, the two fall in love and begin carrying on
an affair. He can't seem to save her from her apparent possession, and
eventually she acts out the destiny of the deceased woman and plunges to her
death from a church tower.
Grief-stricken and withdrawn, Scotty spends several years in a mental
hospital, then is released only to cross paths with a woman who is the
spitting image of Madeline. Her name, however, is Judy Barton, and she
claims to know nothing of Scotty or Madeline. Scotty won't leave her alone,
however, and the way in which he insists she make herself over to look exactly
like Madeline did, as well as her curious complicity, is truly disturbing and
perverse as portrayed by Stewart and Novak. Hitchcock handles  these
psychological themes deftly, particularly in the long, mostly dialogue-free
scenes in the beginning of the film in which Scotty follows Madeline from
place to place. This transplants Scotty's obsession with Madeline to the
audience, making the shift in perspective towards the end when we discover how
truly flawed he is  as a protagonist all the more powerful and frightening.
It is a shame, then, that the script was not any better, because "Vertigo"
might have been a true four-star masterpiece if the writing had been a little
more polished. For one thing, some of the dialogue is just plain silly, such
as when the condition which requires the commitment of the nearly vegetative
Scotty to a mental hospital is described as "melancholia, combined with a
guilt complex"; I know many people who could be said to be suffering from both
of those conditions, and none of them are catatonic. More notably, the
connection between Madeline and Judy and Scotty hinges on a rather bizarre and
excessively complex scheme, while not completely implausible, is not the sort
of thing in which most rational human beings would get themselves involved.
There are other instances of illogical behavior or plot development which seem
to indicate that the screenwriters were so intent on capturing the
psychological themes of obsession and love for an illusion that they didn't
bother to make sure that the story made sense.
"Vertigo" is not quite a masterpiece, and certainly Hitchcock, Stewart, and
Novak deserved a better script to back up their outstanding work in this film.
But, even in the absence of one, they follow through on what is, if nothing
else, a very intriguing premise, with enough force that the occasional
falterings of the script are almost forgotten in the face of the film's
powerful psychological impact.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading
